Missouri, session 2026, HB1825.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 48.020, 49.082, 50.327, 50.333, 50.334, 51.281, 52.269, 53.082,
54.261, 54.320, 55.091, 56.265, 58.095, and 473.742, RSMo, are repealed and fourteen new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 48.020, 49.082, 50.327, 50.333,
50.334, 51.281, 52.269, 53.082, 54.261, 54.320, 55.091, 56.265, 58.095, and 473.742, to read
as follows:
48.020. 1. All counties of this state are hereby classified, for the purpose of
establishing organization and powers in accordance with the provisions of Section 8, Article
VI, Constitution of Missouri, into four classifications determined as follows:
Classification 1. All counties having an assessed valuation of nine hundred million
dollars and over shall automatically be in the first classification after that county has
maintained such valuation for the time period required by section 48.030; however,
any county of the second classification which, on August 28, 2010, has had an
assessed valuation of at least six hundred million dollars for at least one year may, by
resolution of the governing body of the county, elect to be classified as a county of the
first classification after it has maintained such valuation for the period of time
required by the provisions of section 48.030.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

SS SCS HB 1825 2
Classification 2. All counties having an assessed valuation of six hundred million
dollars and less than the assessed valuation necessary for that county to be in the first
classification shall automatically be in the second classification after that county has
maintained such valuation for the time period required by section 48.030.
Classification 3. All counties having an assessed valuation of less than the assessed
valuation necessary for that county to be in the second classification shall
automatically be in the third classification.
Classification 4. All counties which have attained the second classification prior to
August 13, 1988, and which would otherwise return to the third classification after
August 13, 1988, because of changes in assessed valuation shall remain a county in
the second classification and shall operate under the laws of this state applying to the
second classification. Notwithstanding the foregoing, all counties which have
attained the fourth classification prior to January 1, 2027, and which would
otherwise move to a county of the third classification on January 1, 2027, shall
remain a county in the fourth classification and shall operate under the laws of
the state applying to the second classification through December 31, 2030, subject
to the provisions of subsection 2 of section 48.030.
2. The required assessed valuation for each classification under subsection 1 of this
section shall be increased annually by an amount equal to the percentage change in the annual
average of the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) or zero, whichever is
greater. The state tax commission shall calculate and publish this amount so that it is
available to all counties.
49.082. 1. A county commissioner in any county, other than in a first classification
chartered county or a first classification county not having a charter form of government and
not containing any part of a city with a population of three hundred thousand or more, shall,
subject to any other adjustment otherwise provided in this section, receive an annual salary
computed as set forth in the following schedule. The assessed valuation factor shall be the
amount thereof as shown for the year next preceding the computation. The provisions of this
section shall not permit or require a reduction in the amount of compensation being paid for
the office of commissioner on January 1, 1997.
Assessed Valuation Salary
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $19,140
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 19,800
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 21,120
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 22,440
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 23,760

SS SCS HB 1825 3
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 25,080
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 26,400
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 27,060
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 27,390
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 28,380
300,000,000 or more 29,700
2. A county commissioner who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall receive
an annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $23,800
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 25,800
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 27,800
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 29,800
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 31,700
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 33,700
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 35,700
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 37,700
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 39,700
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 41,600
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 43,600
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 45,600
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 47,600
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 49,600
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 51,500
10,000,000,001 or more 53,500
3. In addition to any compensation provided pursuant to subsection 1 of this section,
the presiding commissioner of any county not having a charter form of government shall
receive two thousand dollars annual salary.
[3.] 4. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to
a commissioner only if the commissioner has completed at least twenty hours of classroom
instruction each calendar year relating to the operations of the commissioner's office when
approved by a professional association of the county commissioners of Missouri unless
[exempted from the training] an alternative option is approved by the professional
association. The professional association approving the program shall provide a certificate of
completion to each commissioner who completes the training program and shall send a list of

SS SCS HB 1825 4
certified commissioners to the treasurer of each county. Expenses incurred for attending the
training session may be reimbursed to a county commissioner in the same manner as other
expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose.
[4.] 5. A county commissioner in any county, other than a first classification charter
county or a first classification county not having a charter form of government and not
containing any part of a city with a population of three hundred thousand or more, shall not,
except upon a two-thirds vote of all the members of the salary commission, receive an annual
compensation in an amount less than the total compensation being received for the office of
county commissioner or presiding commissioner respectively for the particular county for
services rendered or performed on the date the salary commission votes.
50.327. 1. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the salary
schedules contained in sections 49.082, 50.334, 50.343, 51.281, 51.282, 52.269, 53.082,
53.083, 54.261, 54.320, 55.091, 56.265, 58.095, and 473.742 shall be set as a base schedule
for those county officials. Except when it is necessary to increase newly elected or reelected
county officials' salaries, in accordance with Section 13, Article VII, Constitution of
Missouri, to comply with the requirements of this section, the salary commission in all
counties except charter counties in this state shall be responsible for the computation of
salaries of all county officials; provided, however, that any percentage salary adjustments in a
county shall be equal for all such officials in that county and any salary adjustment after
August 28, 2026, shall not decrease the current salary of any official. To the extent that
the current salary of any official exceeds the amount set forth in the salary schedules
contained in sections 49.082, 50.334, 50.343, 51.281, 52.269, 53.082, 53.083, 54.261,
54.320, 55.091, 56.265, 58.095, and 473.742 as of August 28, 2026, such salary may only
be increased as a result of further increases to assessed value as provided in such
sections or in section 50.333.
2. In addition to the amounts set forth in the salary schedules contained in
sections 49.082, 50.334, 50.343, 51.281, 52.282, 52.269, 53.082, 53.083, 54.261, 54.320,
55.091, 56.265, 58.095, and 473.742, salaries shall be adjusted each year on the
anniversary date of each official's current term. The amount of adjustment shall be
based on the following calculation:
(1) Determine the difference between the last completed assessed value for the
county minus the assessed value for the county for the year prior to the last completed
assessed value;
(2) Divide the difference by the amount of the last completed assessed value to
determine the annual assessed value growth;
(3) Multiply the annual assessed value growth by the following amount:
Annual Assessed Value Growth Amount

SS SCS HB 1825 5
Negative No Change
0 - 2.99% 1
3.00 - 5.99% 0.5
6.00 - 6.99% 0.33
7.00 - 7.99% 0.25
8.00 - 9.99% 0.20
10% plus .013
(4) Multiply the product of the calculation set forth in subdivision (3) of this
subsection by the official's current salary; and
(5) Add the product of the calculation set forth in subdivision (4) of this
subsection to the current salary amount. Adjustments made pursuant to this subsection
shall not equal or exceed the salary for the next highest assessed valuation contained in
sections 49.082, 50.334, 50.343, 51.281, 52.282, 52.269, 53.082, 53.083, 54.261, 54.320,
55.091, 56.265, 58.095, and 473.742.
3. Upon majority approval of the salary commission, the annual compensation of
part-time prosecutors contained in section 56.265 and the county offices contained in sections
49.082, 50.334, 50.343, 51.281, 51.282, 52.269, 53.082, 53.083, 54.261, 54.320, 55.091,
58.095, and 473.742 may be increased [by up to two thousand dollars] greater than the
compensation provided by the salary schedules; provided, however, that any vote to increase
compensation be effective for all county offices in that county subject to the salary
commission.
[3.] 4. Upon the majority approval of the salary commission, the annual compensation
of a county coroner of any county not having a charter form of government as provided in
section 58.095 may be increased up to fourteen thousand dollars greater than the
compensation provided by the salary schedule of such section.
[4.] 5. The salary commission of any county of the third classification may amend the
base schedules for the computation of salaries for county officials referenced in subsection 1
of this section to include assessed valuation factors in excess of three hundred million dollars;
provided that the percentage of any adjustments in assessed valuation factors shall be equal
for all such officials in that county.
50.333. 1. There shall be a salary commission in every nonchartered county.
2. The clerk or court administrator of the circuit court of the judicial circuit in which
such county is located shall set a date, time and place for the salary commission meeting and
serve as temporary [chairman] chair of the salary commission until the members of the
commission elect a [chairman] chair from their number. Upon written request of a majority
of the salary commission members the clerk or court administrator of the circuit court shall

SS SCS HB 1825 6
forthwith set the earliest date possible for a meeting of the salary commission. The circuit
clerk or court administrator shall give notice of the time and place of any meeting of the
salary commission. Such notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in
such county at least five days prior to such meeting. Such notice shall contain a general
description of the business to be discussed at such meeting.
3. The members of the salary commission shall be:
(1) The recorder of deeds if the recorder's office is separate from that of the circuit
clerk;
(2) The county clerk;
(3) [The prosecuting attorney;
(4) The sheriff;
(5)] The county commissioners;
[(6)] (4) The collector or treasurer ex officio collector;
[(7)] (5) The treasurer or treasurer ex officio collector;
[(8)] (6) The assessor;
[(9)] (7) The auditor;
[(10)] (8) The public administrator; and
[(11)] (9) The coroner.

In a county with more than one hundred fifty thousand but fewer than two hundred
thousand inhabitants, the prosecuting attorney and the sheriff shall be members of the
salary commission. In any county that utilizes part-time prosecuting attorneys, such
part-time prosecuting attorneys shall be members of the salary commission.
4. Members of the salary commission shall receive no additional compensation for
their services as members of the salary commission. A majority of members shall constitute a
quorum.
[4.] 5. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 610.021 and 610.022, all meetings
of a county salary commission shall be open meetings and all votes taken at such meetings
shall be open records. Any vote taken at any meeting of the salary commission shall be taken
by recorded yeas and nays.
[5.] 6. In every county, the salary commission shall meet at least once before
November thirtieth of each odd-numbered year and may meet in any even-numbered year.
The salary commission may meet as many times as it deems necessary and may meet after
November thirtieth and prior to December fifteenth of any odd-numbered year if the
commission has met at least once prior to November thirtieth of that year. At any meeting of
the salary commission, the members shall elect a [chairman] chair from their number. The

SS SCS HB 1825 7
county clerk shall present a report on the financial condition of the county to the commission
once the [chairman] chair is elected, and shall keep the minutes of the meeting.
[6.] 7. For purposes of this section, the 1988 base compensation is the compensation
paid on September 1, 1987, plus the same percentage increase paid or allowed, whichever is
greater, to the presiding commissioner or the sheriff, whichever is greater, of that county for
the year beginning January 1, 1988. Such increase shall be expressed as a percentage of the
difference between the maximum allowable compensation and the compensation paid on
September 1, 1987. [At its meeting in 1987 and at any meeting held in 1988, the salary
commission shall determine the compensation to be paid to every county officer holding
office on January 1, 1988.] The salary commission shall establish the compensation for each
office at an amount not greater than that set by law as the maximum compensation. If the
salary commission votes to increase compensation, but not to pay the maximum amount
authorized by law for any officer or office, then the increase in compensation shall be the
same percentage increase for all officers and offices and shall be expressed as a percentage of
the difference between the maximum allowable compensation and the compensation being
received at the time of the vote. If two-thirds of the members of the salary commission vote
to decrease the compensation being received at the time of the vote below that compensation,
all officers shall receive the same percentage decrease. The commission may vote not to
increase or decrease the compensation and that compensation shall continue to be the salary
of such offices and officers during the subsequent term of office.
[7.] 8. For the year 1989 and every second year thereafter, the salary commission
shall meet in every county as many times as it deems necessary on or prior to November
thirtieth of any such year for the purpose of determining the amount of compensation to be
paid to county officials. For each year in which the commission meets, the members shall
elect a [chairman] chair from their number. The county clerk shall present a report on the
financial condition of the county to the commission once the [chairman] chair is elected, and
shall keep minutes of the meeting. The salary commission shall then consider the
compensation to be paid for the next term of office for each county officer to be elected at
their next general election. If the commission votes not to increase or decrease the
compensation, the salary being paid during the term in which the vote was taken shall
continue as the salary of such offices and officers during the subsequent term of office. If the
salary commission votes to increase the compensation, all officers or offices whose
compensation is being considered by the commission at that time shall receive the same
percentage of the maximum allowable compensation. However, for any county in which all
offices' and officers' salaries have been set at one hundred percent of the maximum allowable
compensation, the commission may vote to increase the compensation of all offices except
that of full-time prosecuting attorneys at that or any subsequent meeting of the salary

SS SCS HB 1825 8
commission without regard to any law or maximum limitation established by law. Such
increase shall be expressed as a percentage of the compensation being paid during the term of
office when the vote is taken, and each officer or office whose compensation is being
established by the salary commission at that time shall receive the same percentage increase
over the compensation being paid for that office during the term when the vote is taken. This
increase shall be in addition to any increase mandated by an official's salary schedule because
of changes in assessed valuation during the current term. If the salary commission votes to
decrease the compensation, a vote of two-thirds or more of all the members of the salary
commission shall be required before the salary or other compensation of any county office
shall be decreased below the compensation being paid for the particular office on the date the
salary commission votes, and all officers and offices shall receive the same percentage
decrease.
[8.] 9. The salary commission shall issue, not later than December fifteenth of any
year in which it meets, a report of compensation to be paid to each officer and the
compensation so set shall be paid beginning with the start of the subsequent term of office of
each officer. The report of compensation shall be certified to the clerk of the county
commission for the county and shall be in substantially the following form:
The salary commission for ______County hereby certifies that it has met pursuant to
law to establish compensation for county officers to be paid to such officers during the
next term of office for the officers affected. The salary commission reports that there
100 shall be (no increase in compensation) (an increase of ______percent) (a decrease of _
101 _____percent) (county officer's salaries set at ______percent of the maximum
102 allowable compensation).
103
104 Salaries shall be adjusted each year on the official's year of incumbency for any change in the
105 last completed assessment that would affect the maximum allowable compensation for that
106 office.
107 [9.] 10. For the meeting in 1989 and every meeting thereafter, in the event a salary
108 commission in any county fails, neglects or refuses to meet as provided in this section, or in
109 the event a majority of the salary commission is unable to reach an agreement and so reports
110 or fails to certify a salary report to the clerk of the county commission by December fifteenth
111 of any year in which a report is required to be certified by this section, then the compensation
112 being paid to each affected office or officer on such date shall continue to be the
113 compensation paid to the affected office or officer during the succeeding term of office.
114 [10.] 11. Other provisions of law notwithstanding, in every instance where an officer
115 or employee of any county is paid a mileage allowance or reimbursement, the county
116 commission shall allow or reimburse such officers or employees out of the county treasury at

SS SCS HB 1825 9
117 the highest rate paid to any county officer for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in
118 the performance of their official duties. The county commission of any county may elect to
119 pay a mileage allowance for any county commissioner for travel going to and returning from
120 the place of holding commission meetings and for all other necessary travel on official county
121 business in the personal motor vehicle of the commissioner presenting the claim. The
122 governing body of any county of the first classification [not having a charter form of
123 government] may provide by order for the payment of mileage expenses of elected and
124 appointed county officials by payment of a certain amount monthly which would reflect the
125 average monthly mileage expenses of such officer based on the amount allowed pursuant to
126 state law for the payment of mileage for state employees. Any order entered for such purpose
127 shall not be construed as salary, wages or other compensation for services rendered.
128 [11.] 12. The term "maximum allowable compensation" as used in this section means
129 the highest compensation which may be paid to the specified officer or office in the particular
130 county based on the salary schedule established by law for the specified officer or office. If
131 the salary commission at its meeting in 1987 voted for one hundred percent of the maximum
132 allowable compensation and does not change such vote at its meeting held within thirty days
133 after May 13, 1988, as provided in subsection 6 of this section, the one hundred percent shall
134 be calculated on the basis of the total allowable compensation permitted after May 13, 1988.
135 [12.] 13. At the salary commission meeting which establishes the percentage rate to
136 be applied to county officers during the next term of office, the salary commission may
137 authorize the further adjustment of such officers' compensation as a cost-of-living component
138 and effective January first of each year, the compensation for county officers may be adjusted
139 by the county commission, and if the adjustment of compensation is authorized, the
140 percentage increase shall be the same for all county officers, not to exceed the percentage
141 increase given to the other county employees. The compensation for all county officers may
142 be set as a group, although the change in compensation will not become effective until the
143 next term of office for each officer.
144 [13. At the salary commission meeting in 1997 which establishes the salaries for
145 those officers to be elected at the general election in 1998, the salary commission of each
146 noncharter county may provide salary increases for associate county commissioners elected in
147 1996. This one-time increase is necessitated by the change from two- to four-year terms for
148 associate commissioners pursuant to house bill 256, passed by the first regular session of the
149 eighty-eighth general assembly in 1995.]
50.334. 1. In all counties, except counties of the first classification having a charter
form of government and counties of the first classification not having a charter form of
government and not containing any part of a city with a population of three hundred thousand
or more, each recorder of deeds, if the recorder's office is separate from that of the circuit

SS SCS HB 1825 10
clerk, shall receive as total compensation for all services performed by the recorder, except as
provided pursuant to section 50.333, an annual salary which shall be computed on an assessed
valuation basis as set forth in the following schedule. The assessed valuation factor shall be
the amount thereof as computed for the year next preceding the computation. The county
recorder of deeds whose office is separate from that of the circuit clerk in any county, other
than a county of the first classification having a charter form of government or a county of the
first classification not having a charter form of government and not containing any part of a
city with a population of three hundred thousand or more, shall not, except upon two-thirds
vote of all the members of the salary commission, receive an annual compensation in an
amount less than the total compensation being received for the office of county recorder of
deeds in the particular county for services rendered or performed on January 1, 1997.
Assessed Valuation Salary
$ 8,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
300,000,000 or more 45,000
2. A recorder of deeds who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall receive an
annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100

SS SCS HB 1825 11
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
10,000,000,001 or more 81,100
3. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to the
recorder only if he has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction each calendar
year relating to the operations of the recorder's office when approved by a professional
association of the county recorders of deeds of Missouri unless [exempted from the training]
an alternative option is approved by the professional association. The professional
association approving the program shall provide a certificate of completion to each recorder
who completes the training program and shall send a list of certified recorders to the treasurer
of each county. Expenses incurred for attending the training session shall be reimbursed to
the county recorder in the same manner as other expenses as may be appropriated for that
purpose.
51.281. 1. The county clerk in any county, other than in a first classification county,
shall receive an annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule. The assessed
valuation factor shall be the amount thereof as shown for the year next preceding the
computation. The provisions of this section shall not permit or require a reduction in the
amount of compensation being paid for the office of clerk on January 1, 1997.
Assessed Valuation Salary
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
300,000,000 or more 45,000

SS SCS HB 1825 12
2. A county clerk who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall receive an
annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
10,000,000,001 or more 81,100
3. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to the
clerk only if the clerk has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction each
calendar year relating to the operations of the clerk's office when approved by [a professional]
the Missouri association of [the] county clerks [of Missouri] and election authorities unless
[exempted from the training] an alternative option is approved by the professional
association. The professional association approving the program shall provide a certificate of
completion to each clerk who completes the training program and shall send a list of certified
clerks to the treasurer of each county. Expenses incurred for attending the training session
may be reimbursed to the county clerk in the same manner as other expenses as may be
appropriated for that purpose.
[3.] 4. The county clerk may retain any fees to which he is entitled for services
performed in the issuance of fish and game licenses or permits.
[4.] 5. The county clerk in any county, other than a first classification charter county
or a first classification county not having a charter form of government and not containing
any part of a city with a population of three hundred thousand or more, shall not, except upon
two-thirds vote of all the members of the salary commission, receive an annual compensation
in an amount less than the total compensation being received for the office of county clerk in

SS SCS HB 1825 13
the particular county for services rendered or performed on the date the salary commission
votes.
52.269. 1. In all counties, except first classification counties having a charter form of
government and first classification counties not having a charter form of government and not
containing any part of a city with a population of three hundred thousand or more, the county
collector shall receive an annual salary which shall be paid in equal monthly installments by
the county. The salary shall be computed on an assessed valuation basis as provided in this
subsection. The assessed valuation factor shall be the amount as shown for the year next
preceding the annual salary computation. A county collector subject to the provisions of this
section shall not receive an annual compensation less than the total compensation being
received by the county collector in that county for services rendered or performed for the
period beginning March 1, 1987, and ending February 29, 1988. The county collector shall
receive the same percentage adjustments provided by the county salary commissions for
county officers in that county pursuant to section 50.333. The provisions of this section shall
not permit or require a reduction in the amount of compensation being paid for the office of
county collector on January 1, 1997, or less than the total compensation being received for the
services rendered or performed for the period beginning March 1, 1987, and ending February
29, 1988. The salary shall be computed on the basis of the following schedule:
Assessed Valuation Salary
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
300,000,000 or more 45,000
2. A county collector who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall receive an
annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100

SS SCS HB 1825 14
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
10,000,000,001 or more 81,100
3. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to the
collector only if the collector has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction
each calendar year relating to the operations of the collector's office when approved by a
professional association of the county collectors of Missouri unless [exempted from the
training] an alternative option is approved by the professional association. The
professional association approving the program shall provide a certificate of completion to
each collector who completes the training program and shall send a list of certified collectors
to the treasurer of each county. Expenses incurred for attending the training session may be
reimbursed to the county collector in the same manner as other expenses as may be
appropriated for that purpose.
[3.] 4. Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, any fee provided for in
section 52.250 or 52.275, when collected on ditch and levee taxes, shall not be collected on
behalf of the county and deposited into the county general revenue fund. Such fee shall be
retained by the collector as compensation for his services, in addition to any amount provided
for such collector in this section.
[4.] 5. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section, after the next general
election following January 1, 1988, all fees collected by the collector shall be collected on
behalf of the county and deposited in the county general revenue fund.
53.082. 1. The county assessor in any county, other than in a first classification
county, shall receive an annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule
provided in this subsection. The assessed valuation factor shall be the amount thereof as
shown for the year next preceding the computation. The provisions of this section shall not

SS SCS HB 1825 15
permit or require a reduction in the amount of compensation being paid for the office of
assessor on September 1, 1997.
Assessed Valuation Salary
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
300,000,000 or more 45,000
2. A county assessor who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall receive an
annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
10,000,000,001 or more 81,100
3. The compensation for county assessors in second, third and fourth classification
counties for the term of office beginning September 1, 1997, shall be calculated pursuant to

SS SCS HB 1825 16
the salary schedule in this section using the percentage increase approved by the county salary
commission when establishing the compensation for the office of county assessor at the salary
commission meeting in 1997. This salary shall become effective on September 1, 1997.
[3.] 4. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to
the assessor only if the assessor has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction
each calendar year relating to the operations of the assessor's office when approved by a
professional association of the county assessors of Missouri unless [exempted from the
training] an alternative option is approved by the professional association. The
professional association approving the program shall provide a certificate of completion to
each assessor who completes the training program and shall send a list of certified assessors
to the treasurer of each county. Expenses incurred for attending the training session may be
reimbursed to the county assessor in the same manner as other expenses as may be
appropriated for that purpose.
[4.] 5. The county assessor in any county, except a first classification county, shall
not, except upon two-thirds vote of all the members of the salary commission, receive an
annual compensation in an amount less than the total compensation being received for the
office of county assessor in the particular county for services rendered or performed on the
date the salary commission votes.
54.261. 1. The county treasurer in counties of the first classification, not having a
charter form of government and containing a portion of a city with a population of three
hundred thousand or more, and in counties of the second, third and fourth classifications of
this state, shall receive as compensation for services performed by the treasurer an annual
salary based upon the assessed valuation of the county. The provisions of this section shall
not permit or require a reduction, nor shall require an increase, in the amount of compensation
being paid for the office of treasurer on January 1, 2002.
2. The amount of salary based upon assessed valuation shall be computed according
to the following schedule:
Assessed Valuation Salary
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000

SS SCS HB 1825 17
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
300,000,000 or more 45,000
3. A county treasurer who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall receive an
annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
$10,000,000,001 or more 81,100
4. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to the
treasurer only if the treasurer has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction
each calendar year relating to the operations of the treasurer's office when approved by a
professional association of the county treasurers or county collectors of Missouri unless
[exempted from the training] an alternative option is approved by the professional
association. The professional association approving the program shall provide a certificate of
completion to each treasurer who completes the training program and shall send a list of
certified treasurers to the county commission of each county. Expenses incurred for attending
the training session shall be reimbursed to the county treasurer in the same manner as other
expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose.
[4.] 5. The county treasurer in any county, other than a county of the first
classification having a charter form of government or a county of the first classification not
having a charter form of government and not containing any part of a city with a population

SS SCS HB 1825 18
of three hundred thousand or more, shall not, except upon two-thirds vote of all the members
of the commission, receive an annual compensation in an amount less than the total
compensation being received for the office of county treasurer in the particular county for
services rendered or performed on the date the salary commission votes.
[5.] 6. In the event of a vacancy due to death, resignation, or otherwise in the office of
treasurer in any county except a county with a charter form of government, and when there is
no deputy treasurer, the county commission shall appoint a qualified acting treasurer until
such time as the vacancy is filled by the governor pursuant to section 105.030 or the elected
treasurer returns to work. The county commission shall employ and fix the compensation of
clerical and other assistants necessary to enable the interim treasurer to efficiently perform the
duties of the office.
54.320. 1. The county collector-treasurer in counties of the third and fourth
classifications adopting township organization shall receive an annual salary as set forth in
the following schedule. The assessed valuation factor shall be the amount thereof as shown
for the year next preceding the computation. A county collector-treasurer subject to the
provisions of this section shall not receive an annual compensation less than the total
compensation being received by the county treasurer ex officio collector in that county for
services rendered or performed for the period beginning March 1, 1987, and ending February
29, 1988. The county collector-treasurer shall receive the same percentage adjustments
provided by county salary commissions for county officers in that county pursuant to section
50.333. The provisions of this section shall not permit or require a reduction in the amount of
compensation being paid for the office of county treasurer ex officio collector on January 1,
1997, or less than the total compensation being received for the services rendered or
performed for the period beginning March 1, 1987, and ending February 29, 1988. The salary
shall be computed on the basis of the following schedule:
Assessed Valuation Salary
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000

SS SCS HB 1825 19
300,000,000 to 449,999,999 45,000

In addition, the collector-treasurer shall collect on behalf of the county a fee for the collection
of all back taxes and all delinquent taxes of two percent on all sums collected to be added to
the face of the tax bill, and collected from the party paying the tax. The collector-treasurer
shall collect on behalf of the county a fee of three percent on all licenses, including current
railroad and utility taxes, surtax, back taxes, delinquent taxes and interest collected by the
collector-treasurer, to be deducted from the amounts collected. The collector-treasurer shall
collect on behalf of the county for the purpose of mailing statements and receipts required by
section 139.350 a fee of one-half of one percent on all licenses and all taxes, including current
taxes, back taxes, delinquent taxes, and interest collected by the collector-treasurer, to be
deducted from the amounts collected. All fees collected under this section shall be collected
on behalf of the county and shall be deposited in the county treasury or as provided by law.
Collector-treasurers in counties having a township form of government are entitled to collect
such fees immediately upon an order of the circuit court under section 139.031. If the protest
is later sustained and a portion of the taxes so paid is returned to the taxpayer the county shall
return that portion of the fee collected on the amount returned to the taxpayer. The collector-
treasurer in each of the third and fourth classification counties which have adopted the
township form of county government is entitled to employ deputies and assistants, and for the
deputies and assistants is allowed not less than the amount allowed in 2003-2004, whichever
is greater.
2. A county collector-treasurer who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall
receive an annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100

SS SCS HB 1825 20
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
10,000,000,001 or more 81,100
3. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the collector-treasurer in
each county of the third or fourth classification having a township form of government shall
employ not fewer than one full-time deputy. The collector-treasurer may employ such
number of deputies and assistants as may be necessary to perform the duties of the office of
collector-treasurer promptly and correctly, as determined by the collector-treasurer. The
office of the collector-treasurer shall be funded sufficiently to compensate deputies and
assistants at a level no less than the compensation provided for other county employees. Such
deputies and assistants shall be allowed adjustments in compensation at the same percentage
as provided for other county employees, as effective January first each year.
[3.] 4. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to
the collector-treasurer only if such officer has completed at least twenty hours of classroom
instruction each calendar year relating to the operations of the collector-treasurer's office
when approved by a professional association of the county treasurers or county collectors of
Missouri unless [exempted from the training] an alternative option is approved by the
professional association. The professional association approving the program shall provide a
certificate of completion to each collector-treasurer who completes the training program and
shall send a list of certified collector-treasurers to the county commission of each county.
Expenses incurred for attending the training session may be reimbursed to the county
collector-treasurer in the same manner as other expenses as may be appropriated for that
purpose.
55.091. 1. The county auditor in any county, other than in a first classification
chartered county or a first classification county not having a charter form of government and
not containing any part of a city with a population of three hundred thousand or more, shall
receive an annual salary computed on an assessed valuation basis as set forth in the following
schedule. The assessed valuation factor shall be the amount thereof as shown for the year
next preceding the computation. The provisions of this section shall not permit or require a
reduction in the amount of compensation being paid for the office of auditor on January 1,
1997.
Assessed Valuation Salary
$131,000,000 to 189,999,999 $40,500
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000

SS SCS HB 1825 21
300,000,000 to 399,999,999 45,000
400,000,000 to 499,999,999 46,000
500,000,000 or more 47,000
2. A county auditor who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall receive an
annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
10,000,000,001 or more 81,100
3. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to the
auditor only if the auditor has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction each
calendar year relating to the operations of the auditor's office when approved by a
professional association of the county auditors of Missouri unless [exempted from the
training] an alternative option is approved by the professional association. The
professional association approving the program shall provide a certificate of completion to
each auditor who completes the training program and shall send a list of certified auditors to
the treasurer of each county. Expenses incurred attending the training session may be
reimbursed to the county auditor in the same manner as other expenses as may be
appropriated for that purpose.
[3.] 4. The county auditor in any county, other than a first classification charter
county, shall not, except upon two-thirds vote of all the members of the salary commission,
receive an annual compensation less than the total compensation being received for the office

SS SCS HB 1825 22
of county auditor in the particular county for services rendered or performed on the date the
salary commission votes.
56.265. 1. The county prosecuting attorney in any county[, other than in a chartered
county,] shall receive an annual salary computed [using the following schedule, when
applicable. The assessed valuation factor shall be the amount thereof as shown for the year
immediately preceding the year for which the computation is done] as provided in this
subsection.
(1) For a full-time [prosecutor] prosecuting attorney of a charter, first, or second
class county, or of a city not within a county, the [prosecutor] prosecuting attorney shall
receive compensation equal to one hundred percent of the compensation of [an associate] a
circuit judge[;].
(2) For a [part-time prosecutor:] full-time prosecuting attorney of a third or fourth
class county, the prosecuting attorney shall receive compensation equal to one hundred
percent of the compensation of an associate circuit judge or, upon approval by a
majority of the county commission, the prosecuting attorney shall receive compensation
equal to ninety-five percent of the compensation of a circuit judge.
(3) Upon approval by a majority of the county commission, a part-time
prosecuting attorney shall receive compensation equal to between thirty and sixty
percent of the compensation of an associate circuit judge.
[Assessed Valuation] [Amount]
[$18,000,000] [t- [40,999,999] [$37,000]
o]
[41,000,000] [t- [53,999,999] [38,000]
o]
[54,000,000] [t- [65,999,999] [39,000]
o]
[66,000,000] [t- [85,999,999] [41,000]
o]
[86,000,000] [t- [99,999,999] [43,000]
o]
[100,000,000] [t- [130,999,999] [45,000]
o]
[131,000,000] [t- [159,999,999] [47,000]
o]
[160,000,000] [t- [189,999,999] [49,000]
o]

SS SCS HB 1825 23
[190,000,000] [t- [249,999,999] [51,000]
o]
[250,000,000] [t- [299,999,999] [53,000]
o]
[300,000,000] [- [more] [55,000]
o-
r]
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, no
prosecuting attorney who has held the office of prosecuting attorney prior to January 1,
2027, shall have their compensation lowered by the implementation of the compensation
procedures of this section, nor shall any prosecuting attorney have their compensation
lowered during their tenure of office.
2. Two thousand dollars of the salary shall be payable to any prosecuting attorney
only if the prosecuting attorney has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction
each calendar year relating to the operations of the prosecuting attorney's office when
approved by a professional association of the county prosecuting attorneys of Missouri unless
exempted from the training by the professional association. The professional association
approving the program shall provide a certificate of completion to each prosecuting attorney
who completes the training program and shall send a list of certified prosecuting attorneys to
the treasurer of each county or city not within a county. Expenses incurred for attending the
training session may be reimbursed to the prosecuting attorney in the same manner as other
expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose.
3. Each calendar year, five thousand dollars of the salary shall be payable to any
prosecuting attorney only if the prosecuting attorney has collected the data described in
subsection 2 of section 56.750 in a manner approved by the prosecutors coordinators training
council and makes the data described in subsection 2 of section 56.750 readily accessible to
the Missouri office of prosecution services. The Missouri office of prosecution services shall
provide a certificate of compliance to each prosecuting attorney who complies with this
subsection and shall send a list of any certified prosecuting attorney to the respective treasurer
of each county or city not within a county.
4. For each calendar year, three thousand dollars of the salary shall be payable to any
prosecuting attorney only if the prosecuting attorney has provided discovery to criminal
defense attorneys who have entered an appearance on behalf of a defendant in a manner
approved by the prosecutors coordinators training council. The Missouri office of
prosecution services shall provide a certificate of compliance to each prosecuting attorney

SS SCS HB 1825 24
who complies with this subsection and shall send a list of any certified prosecuting attorney to
the respective treasurer of each county or city not within a county.
5. As used in this section, the term "prosecuting attorney" includes the circuit attorney
of any city not within a county.
6. The prosecuting attorney of any county which becomes a county of the first
classification during a four-year term of office or a county which passed the proposition
authorized by subsection 1 of section 56.363 shall not be required to devote full time to such
office pursuant to section 56.067 until the beginning of the prosecuting attorney's next term of
office or until the proposition otherwise becomes effective.
7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any county with a
vacancy in the office of prosecuting attorney for more than sixty days may consolidate
with one contiguous county with a sitting prosecuting attorney upon a unanimous vote
of the county commissions of such counties to establish a cooperative regional
prosecuting attorney's office at any time. The prosecuting attorney of the contiguous
county shall then become the prosecuting attorney of that region for the remainder of
that prosecuting attorney's term of office or until such time as the governor appoints a
prosecuting attorney to fill the vacant prosecuting attorney position pursuant to section
105.030. Regional prosecuting attorneys shall be designated as full-time prosecuting
attorneys and shall be compensated in the manner provided under the provisions of
subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section. No two counties that each have sitting
prosecuting attorneys shall be permitted to consolidate in the manner described in this
section.
8. The provisions of section 56.066 shall not apply to full-time prosecutors who are
compensated pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section.
58.095. 1. The county coroner in any county not having a charter form of
government shall receive an annual salary computed on a basis as set forth in the following
schedule, as well as any adjustment authorized under subsection [3] 4 of section 50.327. The
provisions of this section shall not permit or require a reduction in the amount of
compensation being paid for the office of coroner on January 1, 2025:
Assessed Valuation Salary
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $8,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 8,500
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 9,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 9,500
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 10,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 11,000

SS SCS HB 1825 25
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 12,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 13,000
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 14,000
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 15,000
300,000,000 or more 16,000
2. (1) One thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to
the coroner, deputy coroner, and assistants only if the coroner, deputy coroner, or assistant has
completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction each calendar year as presented by a
state-recognized and -accredited or nationally recognized and accredited credentialing
organization that certifies individuals to conduct death investigations. Certified training
completion shall be submitted to a professional association of the county coroners of Missouri
which, upon validating the certified training, shall submit the individual's name to the county
treasurer and department of health and senior services indicating the individual is compliant
with the training requirements.
(2) Expenses incurred for attending the training session shall be reimbursed to the
county coroner in the same manner as other expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose
to the extent that such expenses are not fully reimbursed under paragraph (c) of subdivision
(2) of subsection 1 of section 58.208.
3. The county coroner in any county not having a charter form of government shall
not, except upon two-thirds vote of all the members of the salary commission, receive an
annual compensation in an amount less than the total compensation being received for the
office of county coroner in the particular county for services rendered or performed on the
date the salary commission votes.
4. For the term beginning in 1997, the compensation of the coroner, in counties in
which the salary commission has not voted to pay one hundred percent of the maximum
allowable salary, shall be a percentage of the maximum allowable salary established by this
section. The percentage applied shall be the same percentage of the maximum allowable
salary received or allowed, whichever is greater, to the presiding commissioner or sheriff,
whichever is greater, of that county for the year beginning January 1, 1997. In those counties
in which the salary commission has voted to pay one hundred percent of the maximum
allowable salary, the compensation of the coroner shall be based on the maximum allowable
salary in effect at each time a coroner's term of office commences following the vote to pay
one hundred percent of the maximum allowable compensation. Subsequent compensation
shall be determined as provided in section 50.333.
473.742. 1. Each public administrator in counties of the second, third or fourth
classification and in the City of St. Louis shall make a determination within thirty days after

SS SCS HB 1825 26
taking office whether such public administrator shall elect to receive a salary as defined
herein or receive fees as may be allowed by law to executors, administrators and personal
representatives. The election by the public administrator shall be made in writing to the
county clerk. Should the public administrator elect to receive a salary, the public
administrator's office may not then elect to change at any future time to receive fees in lieu of
salary. Every public administrator who begins his or her first term on or after January 1,
2024, shall be deemed to have elected to receive a salary as provided in this section.
2. If a public administrator elects to be placed on salary, the salary shall be based
upon the average number of open letters in the two years preceding the term when the salary
is elected, based upon the following schedule:
(1) Zero to five letters: salary shall be a minimum of seven thousand five hundred
dollars;
(2) Six to fifteen letters: salary shall be a minimum of fifteen thousand dollars;
(3) Sixteen to twenty-five letters: salary shall be a minimum of twenty thousand
dollars;
(4) Twenty-six to thirty-nine letters: salary shall be a minimum of twenty-five
thousand dollars;
(5) Public administrators with forty or more letters shall be considered full-time
county officials and shall be paid according to the assessed valuation schedule set forth
below:
Assessed Valuation Salary
$ 8,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
$ 41,000,000 to 53,999,999 $30,000
$ 54,000,000 to 65,999,999 $32,000
$ 66,000,000 to 85,999,999 $34,000
$ 86,000,000 to 99,999,999 $36,000
$ 100,000,000 to 130,999,999 $38,000
$ 131,000,000 to 159,999,999 $40,000
$ 160,000,000 to 189,999,999 $41,000
$ 190,000,000 to 249,999,999 $41,500
$ 250,000,000 to 299,999,999 $43,000
$ 300,000,000 to 449,999,999 $45,000
$ 450,000,000 to 599,999,999 $47,000
$ 600,000,000 to 749,999,999 $49,000
$ 750,000,000 to 899,999,999 $51,000
$ 900,000,000 to 1,049,999,999 $53,000

SS SCS HB 1825 27
$ 1,050,000,000 to 1,199,999,999 $55,000
$ 1,200,000,000 to 1,349,999,999 $57,000
$ 1,350,000,000 and over $59,000
(6) A public administrator with forty or more letters who begins a term after
August 28, 2026, shall receive an annual salary computed as set forth in the following
schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
51,000,000 to 100,000,000 39,100
100,000,001 to 150,000,000 42,100
150,000,001 to 200,000,000 45,100
200,000,001 to 250,000,000 48,100
250,000,001 to 300,000,000 51,100
300,000,001 to 350,000,000 54,100
350,000,001 to 400,000,000 57,100
400,000,001 to 450,000,000 60,100
450,000,001 to 500,000,000 63,100
500,000,001 to 550,000,000 66,100
550,000,001 to 600,000,000 69,100
600,000,001 to 1,000,000,000 72,100
1,000,000,001 to 5,000,000,000 75,100
5,000,000,001 to 10,000,000,000 78,100
10,000,000,001 or more 81,100
(7) The public administrator in the City of St. Louis shall receive a salary not less
than sixty-five thousand dollars;
[(7)] (8) Two thousand dollars of the compensation authorized in this section shall be
payable to the public administrator only if he or she has completed at least twenty hours of
instruction each calendar year relating to the operations of the public administrator's office
when approved by a professional association of the county public administrators of Missouri
unless exempted from the training by the professional association. The professional
association approving the program shall provide a certificate of completion to each public
administrator who completes the training program and shall send a list of certified public
administrators to the treasurer of each county. Expenses incurred for attending the training
session shall be reimbursed to the county public administrator in the same manner as other
expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose.

SS SCS HB 1825 28
3. If a public administrator is appointed by the court as both a guardian and a
conservator to the same ward or protectee, it shall be considered two letters.
4. Notwithstanding subsection 2 or 5 of this section to the contrary, upon majority
approval by the salary commission, a public administrator may be paid according to the
assessed valuation schedule set forth in subdivision (5) of subsection 2 of this section. If the
salary commission elects to pay a public administrator according to the assessed valuation
schedule, the salary commission shall not elect to change at any future time to pay the public
administrator's office according to the average number of open letters in lieu of paying them
according to the assessed valuation schedule.
5. The initial compensation of the public administrator who elects to be put on salary
shall be determined by the average number of letters for the two years preceding the term
when the salary is elected. Salary increases or decreases according to the minimum schedule
set forth in this section shall be adjusted only after the number of open letters places the
workload in a different subdivision for two consecutive years. Minimum salary increases or
decreases shall only take effect upon a new term of office of the public administrator. The
number of letters each year shall be determined in accordance with the reporting requirements
set forth in law.
6. All fees collected by a public administrator who elects to be salaried shall be
deposited in the county treasury or with the treasurer for the City of St. Louis.
7. Any public administrator in a county of the first classification without a charter
form of government with a population of less than one hundred thousand inhabitants who
elects to receive fees in lieu of a salary pursuant to this section may elect to join the Missouri
local government employees' retirement system created pursuant to sections 70.600 to 70.755.
8. (1) A letter of guardianship and a letter of conservatorship shall be counted as
separate letters.
(2) For purposes of this subsection, the following terms mean:
100 (a) "Letter of conservatorship", the appointment of a conservatorship of an estate by
101 the court to a protectee adjudged to be disabled;
102 (b) "Letter of guardianship", the appointment of a guardianship by the court to a ward
103 adjudged to be incapacitated.
✔